Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 10. County Major Feeder Road System
[Repealed]

§§ 65-10-1 through 65-10-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 557, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§65-10-1. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 1]

§65-10-3. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 2; Am Laws, 1978, ch. 516, § 4]

§65-10-5. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 3]

§65-10-7. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 4; 1978, ch. 516, § 5]

§65-10-9. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 5; 1978, ch. 516, § 6]

§65-10-11. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 6; 1978, ch. 516, § 7]

§65-10-13. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 7]

§65-10-15. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 8]

§65-10-17. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 9]

§65-10-19. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 10]

§65-10-21. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 11]

§65-10-23. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 12]

§65-10-25. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 428, § 13]